Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.190

Deposit of funds—Treasurer's bond.

All money collected under the authority of this chapter shall be paid to the treasurer of the commission, deposited by him or her in banks designated by the commission, and disbursed on its order.

The treasurer shall file with the commission a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, in favor of the state and the commission, jointly and severally, in the sum of fifty thousand dollars, and conditioned upon his or her faithful performance of his or her duties and his or her strict accounting of all funds of the commission.

None of the provisions of RCW 43.01.050 shall apply to money collected under this chapter.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6040; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.190. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 15, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-24, part.]